Illinois, session 104th, SB1327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 370c.5 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/370c.5 new)7    Sec. 370c.5. Disability income insurance mental health and 8substance use disorder coverage disclosure. 9    (a) No group or individual policy or contract of long-term 10disability income insurance in this State that limits the 11duration of coverage for mental health and substance use 12disorders shall be offered without a disclosure, provided at 13the time of application, that includes a notification stating 14that:15        (1) the long-term disability coverage selected by the 16    potential policyholder or plan sponsor limits the duration 17    of coverage for mental health or substance use disorders; 18    and19        (2) the potential policyholder or plan sponsor has the 20    right to request more information about the limitation and 21    other coverage options that include an unlimited duration, 22    if available.23    (b) Receipt of the disclosure described in subsection (a)   SB1327 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10928 BAB 21010 b1must be acknowledged by the potential policyholder or plan 2sponsor, and evidence of the disclosure and acknowledgment 3must be retained by the insurance company offering the 4coverage. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 61, 2028.